North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 3. Enhanced Voluntary Agricultural Districts.

§ 106-743.1.
Enhanced voluntary agricultural districts.

A county or a municipality may adopt an ordinance establishing an enhanced voluntary agricultural district. An ordinance adopted pursuant to this Part shall provide:

For the establishment of an enhanced voluntary agricultural district that initially consists of at least the number of contiguous acres of agricultural land, and forestland and horticultural land that is part of a qualifying farm under

G.S. 106-737

or the number of qualifying farms deemed appropriate by the governing board of the county or city adopting the ordinance.

For the formation of the enhanced voluntary agricultural district upon the execution of a conservation agreement, as defined in

G.S. 121-35

, that meets the condition set forth in

G.S. 106-743.2

by the landowners of the requisite acreage to sustain agriculture in the enhanced voluntary agricultural district.

That the form of the agreement under subdivision (2) of this subsection be reviewed and approved by an agricultural advisory board established under

G.S. 106-739

, or other governing board of the county or city that adopted the ordinance.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-78, s. 1, effective July 2, 2021.

The purpose of establishing an enhanced voluntary agricultural district is to allow a county or a city to provide additional benefits to farmland beyond that available in a voluntary agricultural district established under Part 2 of this Article, when the owner of the farmland agrees to the condition imposed under

G.S. 106-743.2

. The county or city that adopted the ordinance may take any action it deems appropriate to encourage the formation of these districts and to further their purposes and objectives.

A county ordinance adopted pursuant to this Part is effective within the unincorporated areas of the county. A city ordinance adopted pursuant to this Part is effective within the corporate limits of the city. A city may amend its ordinances in accordance with G.S. 160A-383.2 with regard to agricultural districts within its planning jurisdiction.

A county or city ordinance adopted pursuant to this Part may be adopted simultaneously with the creation of a voluntary agricultural district pursuant to

G.S. 106-738

.

History.

2005-390, s. 5; 2021-78, s. 1.

§ 106-743.2.
Conservation agreements for farmland in enhanced voluntary agricultural districts; limitation.

A conservation agreement entered into between a county or city and a landowner pursuant to G.S. 106-743.1(a)(2) shall be irrevocable for a period of at least 10 years from the date the agreement is executed. At the end of its term, a conservation agreement shall automatically renew for a term of three years, unless notice of termination is given in a timely manner by either party as prescribed in the ordinance establishing the enhanced voluntary agricultural district. The benefits set forth in this Part shall be available to the farmland that is the subject of the conservation agreement for the duration of the conservation agreement.

History.

2005-390, s. 5.

§ 106-743.3.
Enhanced voluntary agricultural districts entitled to all benefits of voluntary agricultural districts.

The provisions of

G.S. 106-739

through

G.S. 106-741

and

G.S. 106-743

apply to an enhanced voluntary agricultural district under this Part, to an ordinance adopted under this Part, and to any person, entity, or farmland subject to this Part in the same manner as they apply under Part 2 of this Article.

History.

2005-390, s. 5.

§ 106-743.4.
Enhanced voluntary agricultural districts; additional benefits.

Property that is subject to a conservation agreement under

G.S. 106-743.2

that remains in effect may receive up to twenty-five percent (25%) of its gross sales from the sale of nonfarm products and still qualify as a bona fide farm that is exempt from zoning regulations under G.S. 153A-340(b). For purposes of G.S. 153A-340(b), the production of any nonfarm product that the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services recognizes as a “Goodness Grows in North Carolina” product that is produced on a farm that is subject to a conservation agreement under

G.S. 106-743.2

is a bona fide farm purpose. A farmer seeking to benefit from this subsection shall have the burden of establishing that the property’s sale of nonfarm products did not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of its gross sales. A county may adopt an ordinance pursuant to this section that sets forth the standards necessary for proof of compliance.

A person who farms land that is subject to a conservation agreement under

G.S. 106-743.2

that remains in effect is eligible under G.S. 106-850(b) to receive the higher percentage of cost-share funds for the benefit of that farmland under the Agriculture Cost Share Program established pursuant to Article 72 of this Chapter for funds to benefit that farmland.

State departments, institutions, or agencies that award grants to farmers are encouraged to give priority consideration to any person who farms land that is subject to a conservation agreement under

G.S. 106-743.2

that remains in effect.

History.

2005-390, s. 5; 2011-145, s. 13.22A(cc); 2017-108, s. 9(b).

§ 106-743.5.
Waiver of utility assessments.

In the ordinance establishing an enhanced voluntary agricultural district under this Part, a county or a city may provide that all assessments for utilities provided by that county or city are held in abeyance, with or without interest, for farmland subject to a conservation agreement under

G.S. 106-743.2

that remains in effect until improvements on the farmland property are connected to the utility for which the assessment was made.

The ordinance may provide that, when the period of abeyance ends, the assessment is payable in accordance with the terms set out in the assessment resolution.

Statutes of limitations are suspended during the time that any assessment is held in abeyance under this section without interest.

If an ordinance is adopted by a county or a city under this section, then the assessment procedures followed under Article 9 of Chapter 153A or Article 10 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, respectively, shall conform to the terms of this ordinance with respect to qualifying farms that entered into conservation agreements while such ordinance was in effect.

Nothing in this section is intended to diminish the authority of counties or cities to hold assessments in abeyance under G.S 153A-201 and

G.S. 160A-237

.

History.

2005-390, s. 5.